Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.420

Homeowner recovery account.

The homeowner recovery account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All repayments under RCW 18.27.410, private contributions, and other moneys transferred or directed to the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the homeowner recovery program to satisfy unpaid judgments for eligible claims under RCW 18.27.410. Administrative costs of the program may not be paid from the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 213 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 213 ss 3-9: See note following RCW 18.27.040.